Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,112
Brand inspection area; slaughter and hide records; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person located within the brand inspection area who slaughters or has cattle slaughtered for sale or distribution shall keep, in a book for that purpose, a true and faithful record of all cattle purchased and slaughtered. Such record shall also contain a description of the marks, brands, age, weight, and color of all cattle slaughtered. Such record shall contain the date when the cattle were slaughtered and a notation which sets forth by whom the cattle were raised or from whom purchased.

(2) All persons who purchase hides shall keep a record of all hides of cattle purchased by them, which record shall state the name or names of the person or persons from whom purchased, their place of residence, the date of purchase, and all marks and brands on the hide, and the record shall at all times be open for inspection by any peace officer.

(3) A violation of this section is an infraction. A peace officer shall have the authority to write a citation, which shall be waivable, to offenders in violation of this section. A fine under this section shall not exceed two hundred dollars per head for each offense. Violations shall be charged in the county in which the offense occurred.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 43;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 24.